Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.555

Geoduck harvest safety committee.

(1) The department shall establish a geoduck harvest safety committee. The geoduck harvest safety committee consists of one representative from the department, one representative from the department's geoduck diver advisory committee, one representative from an organization representing the interests of geoduck harvesters, and one representative from an organization representing the interests of geoduck divers. Each representative must be appointed by the administrator.

(2) The geoduck harvest safety committee must meet at least quarterly. By December 1, 2013, the committee must submit a recommendation to the department regarding the establishment of a geoduck diver safety program and safety requirements for geoduck divers licensed under RCW 77.65.410.

(3) Upon the establishment of the geoduck diver safety program under RCW 43.30.560, the geoduck harvest safety committee must continue to review and evaluate the safety program's success and effectiveness and recommend to the department appropriate changes to improve the geoduck diver safety program.

[ 2013 c 204 s 4.]